Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-1027
Pension or benefits; existing system; rights retained.

Nothing in sections 15-1001.01, 15-1007.02, 15-1007.05, 15-1013.02, and 15-1022 to 15-1026, the repeal of any sections in Chapter 15, article 10, or the unilateral action of any city of the primary class shall in any manner diminish the right of any person receiving or entitled to receive, now or in the future, pension or other benefits provided for in Chapter 15, article 10, as the sections of such article existed immediately prior to the repeal of any such sections, to receive such pension or other benefits in all respects the same as if such repealed sections remained in full force and effect.

Laws 1987, LB 408, § 10.